Utah statutes.
73-3a-101.   Policy statement.

(1)  To ensure the welfare of its citizens, the state of Utah is dedicated to:

(a)  the conservation of its scarce water resources;

(b)  providing adequate water supplies;

(c)  ensuring that the waters of the state's streams are available to meet the state's water requirements; and

(d)  controlling its water resources in a manner that is in the best interest of the public.

(2)  To fulfill the policy stated in Subsection (1), the state of Utah has entered into interstate compacts on several of the state's streams that flow outside the state.

(3)  The state of Utah recognizes that under certain conditions the transportation of water for use outside the state may not be contrary to:

(a)  the conservation of Utah's waters; or

(b)  the public welfare.

